Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2113.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 27 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 67RENDERING AND TRANSPORTATION OFINEDIBLE KITCHEN GREASESec.6701. Definitions.6702. Establishment and maintenance of Statewide registry.6703. Registration.6704. Recordkeeping.6705. Suspension or revocation of registration.6706. Penalties.6707. Preemption.12345678910111213141516171819 § 6701. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Inedible kitchen grease." Any fat or used cooking grease or oils from any source."Registrant." A person that is registered with the department under this chapter to engage in the rendering or transportation of inedible kitchen grease."Rendering." All recycling, processing and conversion of inedible kitchen grease into fats, oils, proteins and other products that are used in the animal, poultry and pet food industries and other industries."Transportation." The movement of inedible kitchen grease and the loading, unloading, collection or storage incidental to that movement.§ 6702. Establishment and maintenance of Statewide registry.The department shall establish and maintain a Statewide registry of all persons registered to engage in the rendering or transportation of inedible kitchen grease in this Commonwealth under this chapter.§ 6703. Registration.(a) Offense defined.--It shall be unlawful for a person to engage in the rendering or transportation of inedible kitchen grease without being registered with the department in accordance with this section.(b) Duty to register.--A person that engages in the rendering or transportation of inedible kitchen grease shall 20260HB2113PN2734 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 register with the department in accordance with this section.(c) Required information.--When registering with the department, a person that engages in the rendering or transportation of inedible kitchen grease shall provide the following to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department:(1) For a person engaged in the transportation of inedible kitchen grease:(i) The person's name and business address.(ii) A description of the operations to be performed.(iii) The make, model and license plate number of each vehicle to be used in the transportation of inedible kitchen grease.(iv) Proof of vehicle and liability insurance.(v) A list of the names and driver's license numbers of the drivers who will transport the inedible kitchen grease.(vi) A registration fee of $250.(vii) Any other information that the department requires.(2) For a person engaged in the rendering of inedible kitchen grease:(i) The person's name and business address.(ii) A description of the operations to be performed.(iii) Proof of liability insurance.(iv) The location of any facility that the person will use for the rendering of inedible kitchen grease.(v) A registration fee of $250.20260HB2113PN2734 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) Any other information that the department requires.(d) Length of registration.--Each registration under this section shall expire on December 31 each year.(e) Records for future registration.--After an initial registration, a person that engages in the rendering or transportation of inedible kitchen grease shall include the records specified in section 6704 (relating to recordkeeping) with every subsequent registration.(f) Proof of registration.--(1) The department shall issue a registration decal to a person that is registered to transport inedible kitchen grease. The registrant shall conspicuously display the registration decal on each vehicle used in the transportation of inedible kitchen grease.(2) The department shall issue a registration certificate to a person that is registered to render inedible kitchen grease. The registrant shall conspicuously display the registration certificate at each facility used for the rendering of inedible kitchen grease.(g) Refusal.--The department may refuse to register a person that fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter.(h) Appeal.--(1) A person may appeal a decision of the department regarding the refusal to register.(2) The department shall establish procedures for the appeals process, which must provide for notice and a hearing.(3) The department may reverse a decision regarding the refusal to register upon a finding of good cause to do so.§ 6704. Recordkeeping.20260HB2113PN2734 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Rendering.--A registrant who engages in the rendering of inedible kitchen grease shall record and maintain for two years the following:(1) The name of each person who has transported inedible kitchen grease to the registrant.(2) The quantity of inedible kitchen grease received at each facility of the registrant where the rendering of inedible kitchen grease occurs.(3) The date on which the registrant received inedible kitchen grease at each facility where the rendering of inedible kitchen grease occurs.(b) Transportation.--A registrant who engages in the transportation of inedible kitchen grease shall record and maintain for two years the following:(1) The name and address of each facility from which the registrant received inedible kitchen grease, the quantity of inedible kitchen grease received from each facility and each date that the inedible kitchen grease was received.(2) The name and address of each facility to which the registrant delivered inedible kitchen grease, the quantity of inedible kitchen grease delivered to each facility and each date that the inedible kitchen grease was delivered.(c) Location of records.--All records required to be retained in accordance with this section shall be retained at the regular place of business of each registrant for two years and shall be exhibited to any authorized employee of the department upon request.§ 6705. Suspension or revocation of registration.(a) Authorization.--The department may suspend or revoke the registration of a registrant if the registrant has done any of 20260HB2113PN2734 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the following:(1) Violated any provision of this chapter.(2) Knowingly sold or offered for sale inedible kitchen grease to a person who is not a registrant.(3) Knowingly taken possession of inedible kitchen grease:(i) from a person who is not a registrant; or(ii) that has been stolen.(4) Knowingly stolen, misappropriated, contaminated or damaged inedible kitchen grease.(b) Maximum time period.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department shall adopt policies that specify the maximum time period during which a suspension or revocation may be imposed, based on the severity or the number of violations that are the basis of the department's action.(2) The time period for the suspension or revocation shall not exceed three years from the date the suspension or revocation is imposed.(c) Appeal.--(1) A registrant may appeal a decision of the department regarding the suspension or revocation of the registration.(2) The department shall establish procedures for the appeals process, which must provide for notice and a hearing.(3) The department may reverse a decision regarding the suspension or revocation upon a finding of good cause to do so.§ 6706. Penalties.(a) Noncompliance with registration requirements and engaging in prohibited activities.--If a person engages in the 20260HB2113PN2734 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rendering or transportation of inedible kitchen grease and either fails to register with the department in accordance with section 6703 (relating to registration) or is found to have engaged in any of the activities specified under section 6705(a) (relating to suspension or revocation of registration), the person shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine of not more than $5,000 for each violation.(b) Noncompliance with recordkeeping requirements.--A registrant that violates section 6704 (relating to recordkeeping) shall, upon conviction:(1) For a first offense, be subject to a fine of not less than $1,000.(2) For a second offense within a period of one year, be subject to:(i) A fine of not less than $5,000.(ii) The suspension or revocation of the registration of the registrant by the department.(3) For a third or subsequent offense within a period of two years, be subject to:(i) A fine of not less than $10,000.(ii) The suspension or revocation of the registration of the registrant by the department.§ 6707. Preemption.This chapter shall preempt and supersede any ordinance, policy or rule of a political subdivision related to the rendering or transportation of inedible kitchen grease.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2113PN2734 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627